Alabama, session 2026rs, SB237.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 36-25-1.4 is added to the Code of
Alabama 1975, to read as follows:
§36-25-1.4
Nothing in this chapter shall be deemed to limit or
restrict the ability of public institutions of higher
education, along with the public officials and public
employees within the institutions, to:
(1) Accept and award grants and contracts, conduct
research, collaborate with persons both within and outside the
institution, enter into technology transfer agreements, and
otherwise commercialize, protect, and share intellectual
property by agreement in accordance with institution policy;
and
(2) Establish one or more entities organized under
Title 10A to promote innovation and commercialization
Page 1

Title 10A to promote innovation and commercialization
SB237 Engrossed
consistent with the institution's mission.
Section 2. This act shall become effective on June 1,
2026.
Page 2

2026.
SB237 Engrossed


Senate
Read for the first time and referred ................29-Jan-26
to the Senate committee on Judiciary

Read for the second time and placed ................25-Feb-26
on the calendar:
0 amendments

Read for the third time and passed ................10-Mar-26
as amended
Yeas 35
Nays 0
Abstains 0


Patrick Harris,
Secretary.

Page 3